Utah statutes.
48-2e-302.   No agency power of limited partner as limited partner.

(1)  A limited partner is not an agent of a limited partnership solely by reason of being a limited partner.

(2)  A person's status as a limited partner does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited partnership because of the person's conduct.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

